Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.06
Trails; right of access.

When the acquisition of
a parcel of private real property, or an interest therein, for a trail divides
the private real property in such a manner that the owner has no reasonable
access to one part of the divided parcel, the district shall allow reasonable
access across the trail at a location mutually agreed upon by the owner of
such divided parcel and the district.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 5.